Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-307 Liquidation orders. (a)
An order to liquidate the business of a domestic insurer shall appoint the
commissioner and the commissioner's successors in office liquidator, and shall
direct the liquidator forthwith to take possession of the assets of the insurer
and to administer them under the general supervision of the court. The
liquidator shall be vested by operation of law with the title to all of the
property, contracts, and rights of action and all of the books and records of
the insurer ordered liquidated, wherever located, as of the entry of the final
order of liquidation. The filing or recording of the order with the clerk of
the circuit court of the first judicial circuit and at the bureau of
conveyances shall impart the same notice as evidence of title.

(b) Upon issuance of the order, the rights and
liabilities of any such insurer and of its creditors, policyholders,
shareholders, members and all other persons interested in its estate shall
become fixed as of the date of entry of the order of liquidation, except as
provided in section 431:15-308 and section 431:15-327.

(c) An order to liquidate the business of an
alien insurer domiciled in this State shall be in the same terms and have the
same legal effect as an order to liquidate a domestic insurer, except that the
assets and the business in the United States shall be the only assets and
business included therein.

(d) At the time of petitioning for an order of
liquidation, or at any time thereafter, the commissioner, after making
appropriate findings of an insurer's insolvency, may petition the court for a
judicial declaration of such insolvency. After providing such notice and
hearing as it deems proper the court may make the declaration.

(e) Any order issued under this section shall
require accounting to the court by the liquidator. Accountings shall be at
such intervals as the court specifies in its order. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next